Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-799
Livestock certification program; livestock producer; powers.

A livestock producer who is listed in a livestock certification registry may provide registry and certification information regarding the livestock herd when selling livestock from the herd.

Laws 2001, LB 438, § 12.

Definitions, see section 54-701.03.